California statutes. Revenue and Taxation Code
(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19604.

(a) Except for fees received for services under Section 23305e, all moneys and remittances received by the Franchise Tax Board as amounts imposed under Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), and related penalties, additions to tax, fees, and interest imposed under this part, shall be deposited in a special fund in the State Treasury, to be designated the Corporation Tax Fund. The moneys in the fund shall, upon the order of the Controller, be drawn therefrom for the purpose of making refunds under this part or be transferred into the
 General Fund. All undelivered refund warrants shall be redeposited into the Corporation Tax Fund upon receipt by the Controller. Fees received for services under Section 23305e shall be treated as reimbursement of the Franchise Tax Board’s costs and shall be deposited into the General Fund.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the Corporation Tax Fund are hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to the Franchise Tax Board for purposes of making all payments as provided in this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 543, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------

19605.

All moneys and remittances received by the Franchise Tax Board as fees imposed under Section 19532 or 19561 shall be treated as reimbursement of the Franchise Tax Board’s costs and shall be deposited into the General Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 952, Sec. 28.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

19607.

All moneys and remittances received by the Franchise Tax Board as amounts imposed under Sections 17935, 17941, and 17948 and related penalties, additions to tax, interest, and other related amounts imposed under this part, shall be deposited, after clearance of remittances, in the State Treasury and credited to the Corporation Tax Fund.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 543, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2002.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Tax Relief and Refund Account [19611. - 19611.]

19611.

(a) The Tax Relief and Refund Account is hereby created in the General Fund. Notwithstanding Section 13340 of the Government Code, all moneys in the Tax Relief and Refund Account are hereby continuously appropriated, without regard to fiscal year, to the Franchise Tax Board for purposes of making all payments as provided in this section.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of law, all payments required to be made to taxpayers or other persons
 from the Personal Income Tax Fund shall be paid from the Tax Relief and Refund Account.

(c) The Controller shall transfer, as needed, to the Tax Relief and Refund Account:

(1) From the unexpended balance of the annual Budget Act appropriation for Item 9100-101-001, Schedule 80-Renter’s Tax Relief, an amount determined by the Franchise Tax Board to be equivalent to the total amount of renters’ assistance credits and refunds allowed under Section 17053.5.

(A) If there is no unexpended balance of the appropriation, as provided for in paragraph (1), the Controller shall transfer sufficient moneys from the Personal Income Tax Fund to make the renters’ assistance credits and refunds until there is an unexpended balance.

(B) Subsequent to there being no
 unexpended balance of the appropriation, as provided for in paragraph (1), and there being a transfer of moneys from the Personal Income Tax Fund to make the renters’ assistance credits and refunds, reimbursement shall be made from the unexpended balance of the appropriation as provided for in paragraph (1) to the Personal Income Tax Fund. However, if no such appropriation is subsequently made, reimbursement shall be made from the General Fund.

(2) From the disability fund, the amount transferable to the General Fund pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 1176.5 of the Unemployment Insurance Code.

(3) From the Personal Income Tax Fund, such additional amounts as determined by the Franchise Tax Board to be necessary to make the payments required under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Violations [19701. - 19722.]

19701.

Any person who does any of the following is liable for a penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000):

(a) With or without intent to evade any requirement of Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part or any lawful requirement of the Franchise Tax Board, repeatedly over a period of two years or more, fails to file any return or to supply any information required, or who, with or without that intent, makes, renders, signs, or verifies
 any false or fraudulent return or statement, or supplies any false or fraudulent information, resulting in an estimated delinquent tax liability of at least fifteen thousand dollars ($15,000).

(b) Aids, abets, advises, encourages, or counsels any person to evade the tax imposed by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) by not filing any return or supplying any information required under Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part, or, by making, rendering, signing, or verifying any false or fraudulent return or statement, or by supplying false or fraudulent information.

(c) Under this part, is required to pay any estimated tax or tax, who willfully fails to pay that estimated tax or tax, at the time or times required by law or regulations.

The
 penalty shall be recovered in the name of the people in any court of competent jurisdiction. Counsel for the Franchise Tax Board may, upon request of the district attorney or other prosecuting attorney, assist the prosecuting attorney in presenting the law or facts to recover the penalty at the trial of a criminal proceeding for violation of this section.

That person is also guilty of a misdemeanor and shall upon conviction be fined not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) or be imprisoned not to exceed one year, or both, at the discretion of the court, together with costs of investigation and prosecution. The preceding sentence shall not apply to any person who is mentally incompetent, or suffers from dementia, Alzheimer’s disease, or similar condition.

(d) For purposes of subdivision (a), the president of a corporation, or the chief operating officer, is the person presumed to be responsible for
 filing any return or supplying information required from that corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2005, Ch. 74, Sec. 72.   Effective July 19, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

19701.5.

(a) Any person who signs his or her spouse’s name on any income tax return, or any schedules or attachments thereto, or who files electronically pursuant to Section 18621.5, without the consent of the spouse as provided in subdivision (b), is guilty of a misdemeanor and shall upon conviction be fined an amount not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000) or be imprisoned for a term not to exceed one
 year, or both, at the discretion of the court, together with costs of investigation and prosecution.

(b) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), any person who signs his or her spouse’s name shall not be guilty of a misdemeanor when one spouse is physically unable by reason of disease or injury to sign a joint return, and the other spouse, with the oral consent of the one who is incapacitated, signs the incapacitated spouse’s name in the proper place on the return followed by the words “By ____, Spouse (or Husband or Wife),” and by the signature of the signing spouse in his or her own right, provided that a dated statement signed by the spouse who is signing the return is attached to and made a part of the return stating each of the following:

(1) The name of the return being filed.

(2) The taxable year.

(3) The reason for the inability of the spouse who is incapacitated to sign the return.

(4) That the spouse who is incapacitated consented to the signing of the return and that the taxpayer and his or her agent, if any, are responsible for the return as made and incur liability for the penalties provided for erroneous, false, or fraudulent returns.

(c) The penalties provided by this section are cumulative and shall not be construed as restricting any other penalty provided by law based upon the same facts, including any penalty under Section 470 of the Penal Code. However, an act or omission which is made punishable in different ways by this section and different provisions of the Penal Code shall not be punished under more than one provision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 50, Sec. 111.   (SB 1005)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

19702.

The prosecutor may, with the consent of the Franchise Tax Board, compromise any penalty for which he or she may bring action under this chapter. The penalties provided by this chapter are additional to all other penalties provided in Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1993, Ch. 877, Sec. 30.1.   Effective October 6, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 102 of Ch. 877.)
-------------------------------------------

19703.

The certificate of the Franchise Tax Board to the effect that a return has not been filed or that information has not been supplied as required by this part is prima facie evidence that the return has not been filed or that the information has not been supplied.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19704.

Any action or prosecution under this chapter shall be instituted within six years after commission of the offense.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19705.

(a) Any person who does any of the following shall be guilty of a felony and, upon conviction, shall be fined not more than fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) or imprisoned pursuant to subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or both, together with the costs of investigation and prosecution:

(1) Willfully makes and subscribes any return, statement, or other document, that contains or is verified by a written declaration that it is made under penalty of perjury, and he or she does not believe to be true and correct as to every material matter.

(2) Willfully aids or assists in, or procures, counsels, or advises the preparation or presentation under, or in connection with any matter arising under, the Personal Income Tax Law or the Corporation Tax Law, of a return, affidavit, claim, or other document, that is fraudulent or is false as to any material matter, whether or not that falsity or fraud is with the knowledge or consent of the person authorized or required to present that return, affidavit, claim, or document.

(3) Simulates or falsely or fraudulently executes or signs any bond, permit, entry, or other document required by the provisions of the
 Personal Income Tax Law or the Corporation Tax Law, or by any regulation pursuant to that law, or procures the same to be falsely or fraudulently executed or advises, aids in, or connives at that execution.

(4) Removes, deposits, or conceals, or is concerned in removing, depositing, or concealing, any goods or commodities for or in respect whereof any tax is or shall be imposed, or any property upon which levy is authorized by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 19201); or Chapter 8 (commencing with Section 688.010) of Division 1 of, and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 706.010) of Division 2 of, Title 9 of the Code of Civil Procedure, with intent to evade or defeat the assessment or collection of any tax, additions to tax, penalty, or interest imposed by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or this part.

(5) In connection with any
 settlement under Section 19442, or offer of that settlement, or in connection with any closing agreement under Section 19441 or offer to enter into that agreement, or compromise under Section 19443, or offer of that compromise, willfully does any of the following:

(A) Conceals from any officer or employee of this state any property belonging to the estate of a taxpayer or other person liable in respect of the tax.

(B) Receives, withholds, destroys, mutilates, or falsifies any book, document, or record, or makes any false statement, relating to the estate or financial condition of the taxpayer or other person liable in respect of the tax.

(b) In the case of a corporation, the fifty thousand dollars ($50,000) limitation specified in subdivision (a) shall be increased to two hundred thousand dollars ($200,000).

(c) The fact that an individual’s name is signed to a return, statement, or other document filed, including a return, statement, or other document filed using electronic technology pursuant to Section 18621.5, shall be prima facie evidence for all purposes that the return, statement, or other document was actually signed by him or her.

(d) For purposes of this section, “person” means the taxpayer, any member of the taxpayer’s family, any corporation, agent, fiduciary, or representative of, or any other individual or entity acting on behalf of, the taxpayer, or any other corporation or entity owned or controlled by the taxpayer, directly or indirectly, or which owns or controls the taxpayer, directly or indirectly.

(e) The changes made to this section by the act adding this subdivision apply to offers made on or after
 January 1, 1999.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 572.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

19706.

Any person or any officer or employee of any corporation who, within the time required by or under the provisions of this part, willfully fails to file any return or to supply any information with intent to evade any tax imposed by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), or who, willfully and with like intent, makes, renders, signs, or verifies any false or fraudulent return or statement or supplies any false or fraudulent information, is punishable by imprisonment in the county jail not to exceed one year, or in the
 state prison, or by fine of not more than twenty thousand dollars ($20,000), or by both the fine and imprisonment, at the discretion of the court, together with the costs of investigation and prosecution.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 605, Sec. 44.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

19707.

The place of trial for the offenses enumerated in this chapter shall be in the county of residence or principal place of business of the defendant or defendants at the time of commission of the offense. However, if the defendant or defendants had no residence or principal place of business in this state at the time of commission of the offense, the trial shall be held in the County of Sacramento.

In a criminal case charging a defendant or defendants with committing an offense enumerated in this chapter, the place of
 trial may be as set forth in this section, or as provided for in Section 1462.2 or Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 777) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2002, Ch. 784, Sec. 585.   Effective January 1, 2003.)
-------------------------------------------

19708.

Any person required under this part to collect, account for, and pay over any tax or amount required to be withheld who willfully fails to collect or truthfully account for and pay over the tax or amount shall, in addition to other penalties provided by law, be guilty of a felony, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than two thousand dollars ($2,000) or imprisoned pursuant to
 subdivision (h) of Section 1170 of the Penal Code, or both.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 15, Sec. 573.   (AB 109)   Effective April 4, 2011.   Operative October 1, 2011, by Sec. 636 of Ch. 15, as amended by Stats. 2011, Ch. 39, Sec. 68.)
-------------------------------------------

19709.

Any person who, with or without intent to evade, fails to withhold, pursuant to Section 18662 or 18666, or pay over any tax withheld, is guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction be fined an amount not to exceed one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned for not more than one year, or both, at the discretion of the court.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19710.

If a taxpayer fails to file a return within 60 days after the Franchise Tax Board issues a notice and demand for the return, the Franchise Tax Board may petition the court for a writ of mandate to require the taxpayer to file a return. The judgment shall include costs in favor of the prevailing party.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19711.

Any individual required to supply information to his or her employer under Section 13040, 13041, or 13042 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, who willfully supplies false or fraudulent information, or who willfully fails to supply information thereunder which would require an increase in the tax to be withheld under Section 13020 of the Unemployment Insurance Code, shall, in addition to any other penalty otherwise provided by law, upon conviction thereof, be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or imprisoned not more than
 one year, or both.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19712.

Any tax preparer, as defined in subdivision (b) of Section 19169, who endorses or otherwise negotiates (directly or through an agent) any warrant made in respect of the taxes imposed by Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) or Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) which is issued to a taxpayer (other than the tax preparer) shall, in addition to other penalties provided by law, be guilty of a misdemeanor, and upon conviction thereof, shall be fined not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000) or imprisoned not more than one year, or
 both, together with the costs of prosecution.

This section shall not apply where the tax preparer has advanced the taxpayer an amount of money equal to or greater than the amount of the taxpayer’s tax refund.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19713.

(a) Any person or employer who fails to comply with subdivision (b) of Section 19009 shall, in addition to any other penalties provided by law, be guilty of a misdemeanor, and, upon conviction thereof, shall be fined no more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or imprisoned not more than one year, or both, together with the costs of prosecution.

(b) This section shall not apply:

(1) To
 any person or employer, if that person or employer shows that there was reasonable doubt as to (A) whether the law required collection of the tax, or (B) who was required by law to collect the tax.

(2) To any person or employer, if that person or employer shows that the failure to comply with the provisions of subdivision (b) of Section 19009 was due to circumstances beyond his or her control.

(c) For purposes of paragraph (2), a lack of funds existing immediately after the payment of wages (whether or not created by the payment of the wages) shall not be considered to be circumstances beyond the control of a person or employer.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19714.

Whenever it appears to the State Board of Equalization or any court of record of this state that proceedings before it under this part have been instituted or maintained by the taxpayer primarily for delay or that the taxpayer’s position in the proceedings is frivolous or groundless, or that the taxpayer unreasonably failed to pursue available administrative remedies, a penalty in an amount not in excess of five thousand dollars ($5,000) shall be imposed. Any penalty so imposed shall be paid upon notice and demand from the Franchise
 Tax Board and shall be collected as a tax.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19715.

(a) A civil action in the name of the State of California to enjoin any person from further engaging in specified conduct may be commenced at the request of the Franchise Tax Board. Any action under this section shall be brought in accordance with Section 19707. The court may exercise its jurisdiction over that action separate and apart from any other action brought by the State of California against that person.

(b) In any action under subdivision (a), the court may enjoin
 the person from engaging in the specified conduct or in any other activity subject to penalty under this part, if the court finds both of the following:

(1) That the person has engaged in any specified conduct.

(2) That injunctive relief is appropriate to prevent recurrence of that specified conduct.

(c) For purposes of this section, the term “specified conduct” means any action, or failure to take action, subject to penalty under Section 19173, 19174, 19177, or 19178.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2003, Ch. 656, Sec. 12.   Effective January 1, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

19717.

(a) The prevailing party may be awarded a judgment for reasonable litigation costs incurred, in the case of any civil proceeding brought by or against the State of California in a court of record of this state in connection with the determination, collection, or refund of any tax, interest, or penalty under this part.

(b) (1) A judgment for reasonable litigation costs shall not be awarded under subdivision (a) unless the court determines that the
 prevailing party has exhausted all administrative remedies available to that party under this part, including the filing of an appeal as provided in Section 19324. Any failure to agree to an extension of the time for the assessment of any tax shall not be taken into account for purposes of determining whether the prevailing party meets the requirements of the preceding sentence.

(2) An award under subdivision (a) shall be made only for reasonable litigation costs which are allocable to the State of California and not to any other party to the action or proceeding.

(3) No award for reasonable litigation costs may be made under subdivision (a) with respect to any portion of the civil proceeding during which the prevailing party has unreasonably protracted that proceeding.

(c) For purposes of this section:

(1) “Reasonable litigation costs” includes any of the following:

(A) Reasonable court costs.

(B) Based upon prevailing market rates for the kind or quality of services furnished, any of the following:

(i) The reasonable expenses of expert witnesses in connection with the civil proceeding, except that no expert witness shall be compensated at a rate in excess of the highest rate of compensation for expert witnesses paid by the State of California.

(ii) The reasonable cost of any study, analysis, engineering report, test, or project which is found by the court to be necessary for the preparation of the party’s case.

(iii) Reasonable fees paid or incurred for the services of attorneys in connection with the civil proceeding, except that those fees shall not be in excess of one hundred twenty-five dollars ($125) per hour unless the court determines that a special factor, such as the limited availability of qualified attorneys for the proceeding, the difficulty of the issues presented in the case, or the local availability of tax expertise justifies a higher rate. In the case of each calendar year beginning with calendar year 2001, the Franchise Tax Board shall recompute the dollar amount referred to in the preceding sentence. That computation shall be made by increasing the amount in this clause by an amount equal to the cost-of-living adjustment determined under subdivision (h) of Section 17041. If any resulting dollar amount is not a multiple of ten dollars ($10), that dollar amount shall be rounded to the nearest multiple of ten dollars ($10).

(iv) The court may award reasonable attorney fees under subdivision (a) in excess of the attorney fees paid or incurred if the fees are less than the reasonable attorneys’ fees because the attorney is representing the prevailing party for no fee or for a fee which (taking into account all the facts and circumstances) is no more than a nominal fee. This clause shall apply only if the award is paid to the attorney or the attorney’s employer.

(2) (A) “Prevailing party” means any party to any proceeding described in subdivision (a) (other than the State of California or any creditor of the taxpayer involved) that meets either of the following criteria:

(i) Has substantially prevailed with respect to the amount in controversy.

(ii) Has substantially prevailed with respect to the most
 significant issue or set of issues presented.

(B) (i) A party shall not be treated as the prevailing party in a proceeding to which subdivision (a) applies if the State of California establishes that its position in the proceeding was substantially justified.

(ii) For purposes of clause (i), the position of the State of California shall be presumed not to be substantially justified if the Franchise Tax Board did not follow its applicable published guidance in the administrative proceeding. This presumption may be rebutted.

(iii) For purposes of clause (ii), the term “applicable published guidance” means either of the following:

(I) A regulation, legal ruling, notice, information release, or announcement.

(II) Any chief counsel ruling or determination letter issued to the taxpayer.

(iv) For purposes of clause (i), in determining whether the position of the Franchise Tax Board was substantially justified, the court shall take into account whether the Franchise Tax Board has lost in any California Court of Appeal in another district on substantially similar issues, as reflected in a decision certified for publication.

(C) Any determination under this paragraph as to whether a party is a prevailing party shall be made by either of the following:

(i) The court.

(ii) An agreement of the parties.

(3) The term “civil proceeding”
 includes a civil action.

(d) For purposes of this section, in the case of multiple actions which could have been joined or consolidated, or a case or cases involving a return or returns of the same taxpayer (including joint returns of married individuals) which could have been joined in a single proceeding in the same court, the actions or cases shall be treated as one civil proceeding regardless of whether the joinder or consolidation actually occurs, unless the court in which the action is brought determines, in its discretion, that it would be inappropriate to treat the actions or cases as joined or consolidated for purposes of this section.

(e) An order granting or denying an award for reasonable litigation costs under subdivision (a), in whole or in part, shall be incorporated as a part of the decision or judgment in the case and shall be subject to appeal in the same manner
 as the decision or judgment.

(f) For purposes of this section, “position of the State of California” includes either of the following:

(1) The position taken by the State of California in the civil proceeding.

(2) Any administrative action or inaction by the Franchise Tax Board (and all subsequent administrative action or inaction) upon which that proceeding is based.

(g) The amendments made by the act amending this subdivision are effective for costs incurred and services performed more than 180 days after the effective date of the act amending this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 931, Sec. 33.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

19718.

Any employer or agent of an employer who provides a wage statement or similar document to any undocumented worker or former undocumented worker at that person’s request for the purpose of documenting that person’s eligibility for legalization pursuant to the federal Immigration Reform and Control Act (Public Law 99-603), shall not be liable for any penalty or criminal or civil violation under this part relative to the undocumented worker or former undocumented worker based on any facts disclosed in the wage statement or similar
 document so provided.

Nothing in this section shall be construed to limit the liability under any provision of law of any person who engages in the procurement or production of false or fraudulent wage statements or similar documents to any person for purposes of legalization under the federal Immigration Reform and Control Act.

This section does not apply to penalties assessed or criminal actions filed prior to May 1, 1987.

This section does not apply where the Employment Development Department, through independent means, discovers that an employer has withheld personal income tax and disability insurance contributions from workers’ paychecks and has not remitted those moneys to the department.

The immunity from liability pursuant to this section shall apply only to facts disclosed in the wage statement or similar document provided on or
 after the effective date of this section and only until the date of the termination of the legalization provisions for agricultural and nonagricultural workers of the federal Immigration Reform and Control Act. However, the immunity from liability pursuant to this section shall continue until the cause of action is tolled by the applicable statute of limitations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1993, Ch. 31, Sec. 26.   Effective June 16, 1993.   Operative January 1, 1994, by Sec. 83 of Ch. 31.)
-------------------------------------------

19719.

(a) Any person who attempts or purports to exercise the powers, rights, and privileges of a corporation that has been suspended pursuant to Section 23301 or who transacts or attempts to transact intrastate business in this state on behalf of a foreign corporation, the rights and privileges of which have been forfeited pursuant to the section, is punishable by a fine of not less than two hundred fifty dollars ($250) and not exceeding one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by imprisonment not exceeding one year, or both fine and imprisonment.

(b) This section shall not apply to any insurer, or to counsel retained by an insurer on behalf of the suspended corporation, who provides a defense for a suspended corporation in a civil action based upon a claim for personal injury, property damage, or economic losses against the suspended corporation, and, in conjunction with this defense, prosecutes subrogation, contribution, or indemnity rights against persons or entities in the name of the suspended corporation.

(c) Nothing in this section shall create or limit any obligation upon an insurer to defend a suspended corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 856, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

19720.

(a) Any person who does any of the following is liable for a penalty of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000):

(1) Utters, passes, or negotiates a state-issued income tax refund warrant generated as a result of the filing of a return knowing that the recipient is not entitled to the refund.

(2) Procures a state-issued income tax refund, in any form, generated as a result of the filing of a return knowing
 that the recipient is not entitled to the refund.

(3) Aids, abets, advises, encourages, or counsels any individual to utter, pass, or negotiate a state-issued income tax refund warrant, or to procure a state-issued income tax refund, in any form, generated as a result of the filing of a return, knowing that the recipient is not entitled to a refund.

(b) The fact that an individual’s name is endorsed to a state-issued refund warrant shall be prima facie evidence for all purposes that the refund warrant was actually signed by him or her.

(c) The penalty shall be recovered in the name of the people in any court of competent jurisdiction. Counsel for the Franchise Tax Board may, upon request of the district attorney or other prosecuting attorney, assist the prosecuting attorney in presenting the law or facts to recover
 the penalty at the trial of a criminal proceeding for violation of this section.

(d) The person is also guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction shall be punishable by a fine not to exceed ten thousand dollars ($10,000) or by imprisonment not to exceed one year, or both, at the discretion of the court, together with costs of investigation and prosecution.

(e) Any individual guilty under this part shall be subject to Section 502.01 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 163, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

19721.

(a) Any person who, with intent to defraud, does any of the following is liable for a penalty of not more than ten thousand dollars ($10,000):

(1) Willfully utters, passes, or negotiates a state-issued income tax refund warrant generated as a result of the filing of a return knowing that the recipient is not entitled to the refund.

(2) Willfully procures a state-issued income tax refund, in any form, generated
 as a result of the filing of a return knowing that the recipient is not entitled to the refund.

(3) Willfully aids, abets, advises, encourages, or counsels any individual to utter, pass, or negotiate a state-issued income tax refund warrant, or to procure a state-issued income tax refund, in any form, generated as a result of the filing of a return, knowing the recipient is not entitled to the refund.

(b) The person is also punishable by imprisonment in a county jail not to exceed one year, or in the state prison, or by a fine not to exceed fifty thousand dollars ($50,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment, at the discretion of the court, together with the costs of investigation and prosecution.

(c) The fact that an individual’s name is endorsed to a state-issued refund warrant shall be prima facie evidence for
 all purposes that the refund warrant was actually signed by him or her.

(d) The penalty shall be recovered in the name of the people in any court of competent jurisdiction. Counsel for the Franchise Tax Board may, upon request of the district attorney or other prosecuting attorney, assist the prosecuting attorney in presenting the law or facts to recover the penalty at the trial or a criminal proceeding for violation of this section.

(e) Any individual guilty under this part shall be subject to Section 502.01 of the Penal Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 163, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

19722.

(a) (1) Restitution orders or any other amounts imposed by a court of competent jurisdiction for criminal offenses upon a person or any other entity that are due and payable to the Franchise Tax Board may be collected by the Franchise Tax Board in any manner provided by law for collection of a delinquent income tax liability, including, but not limited to, issuance of an order and levy under Article 4 (commencing with Section 706.070) of
 Chapter 5 of Division 2 of Title 9 of Part 2 of the Code of Civil Procedure in the manner provided for earnings withholding orders for taxes.

(2) Amounts imposed by a court of competent jurisdiction as an order of restitution for criminal offenses shall be treated as final and due and payable to the State of California on the date that amount is established on the records of the Franchise Tax Board.

(b) Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001), this part, Part 10.7 (commencing with Section 21001), and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001) shall apply to amounts collected under this section in the same manner and with the same force and effect and to the full extent as if the language of those laws had been incorporated in full into this section, except to the extent that any provision is either inconsistent with this section or is not relevant to this section.

(c) Notwithstanding Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 19301), no refund or credit may be allowed for any amounts paid or payments applied under this section.

(d) Amounts authorized to be collected pursuant to this section shall accrue interest at the greater of the rate applicable to the amounts being collected or the rate provided under Section 19521 from and after the date the amounts are established on the records of the Franchise Tax Board.

(e) Amounts authorized to be collected pursuant to this section are not subject to Section 19255.

(f) Notwithstanding Section 19204 or Chapter 14 (commencing with Section 7150) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code, any portion of the amounts authorized to be collected under this section that remain
 unsatisfied may be collected by the recording of a Notice of State Tax Lien. The Franchise Tax Board may record or extend a recorded Notice of State Tax Lien at any time until the amount due, including any accrued interest, is paid in full.

(g) The Franchise Tax Board may retain those amounts ordered to be paid by a court of competent jurisdiction by a person or any other entity for the costs of investigation incurred by the Franchise Tax Board.

(h) This section shall apply on and after January 1, 2011, to amounts authorized to be collected pursuant to this section that are due and payable to the Franchise Tax Board before, on, or after January 1, 2011.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 359, Sec. 2.   (AB 1530)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9.1. Tax Amnesty [19730. - 19738.]

19730.

The Franchise Tax Board shall administer a tax amnesty program for taxpayers subject to Part 10 (commencing with Section 17001) and Part 11 (commencing with Section 23001), as provided in this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 226, Sec. 11.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

19731.

The tax amnesty program shall be conducted during a two-month period beginning February 1, 2005, and ending March 31, 2005, inclusive, or during a timeframe ending no later than June 30, 2005, pursuant to Section 19733. The program shall apply to tax liabilities for taxable years beginning before January 1, 2003.

(History: Added by Stats. 2004, Ch. 226, Sec. 11.   Effective August 16, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

19732.

(a) For any taxpayer who meets each of the requirements of Section 19733 both of the following apply:
